Montana, session 2025, HB176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 87-1-901, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-1-901. Gray wolf management -- rulemaking -- reporting. (1) Except as provided in subsection
(3), the commission shall establish by rule hunting and trapping seasons for wolves with the intent to reduce the
wolf population in this the state to a sustainable level, but not less than the number of wolves necessary to
support at least 15 breeding pairs 450 wolves, which is the sustainable number of wolves that allows the state
to retain a delisted status for wolves. Trapping seasons must allow for the use of snares by the holder of a
trapping license.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 176

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0176.4
(2) (A) For game management purposes, the commission may apply different management
techniques depending on the conditions in each administrative region with the most liberal harvest regulations
applied in regions with the greatest number of wolves shall MAY SHALL institute an unlimited statewide quota
when the total population in the state equals or exceeds 450 550 wolves, EXCEPT IN AN AREA IMMEDIATELY
ADJACENT TO YELLOWSTONE NATIONAL PARK AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (2)(C). In doing so, the commission may
shall MAY SHALL authorize:
(a)(I) the issuance of more than one Class E-1 or Class E-2 wolf hunting license to an applicant;
(b)(II) (I)the trapping or snaring of more than one wolf by the holder of a trapping license;
(c)(III) (II) the harvest of an unlimited number of wolves by the holder of a single wolf hunting or
wolf trapping license;
(d)(IV) (III) during the wolf trapping season, the use of bait while hunting or trapping wolves as
long as no trap or snare trap is set within 30 feet of exposed bait visible from above; and
(e)(V) (IV) the hunting of wolves on private lands outside of daylight hours with the use of artificial
light or night vision scopes.
(B) WHEN THE TOTAL POPULATION EXCEEDS 450 BUT IS LESS THAN 550, THE COMMISSION SHALL MAY
APPLY DIFFERENT MANAGEMENT TECHNIQUES DEPENDING ON THE CONDITIONS IN EACH ADMINISTRATIVE DISTRICT. THE
MOST LIBERAL HARVEST REGULATIONS MUST BE APPLIED IN DISTRICTS WITH THE GREATEST NUMBER OF WOLVES. IN
DOING SO, THE COMMISSION SHALL MAY AUTHORIZE:
(I) THE ISSUANCE OF MORE THAN ONE CLASS E-1 OR CLASS E-2 WOLF HUNTING LICENSE TO AN
APPLICANT;
(II) THE TRAPPING OR SNARING OF MORE THAN ONE WOLF BY THE HOLDER OF A TRAPPING LICENSE;
(III) THE HARVEST OF AN UNLIMITED NUMBER OF WOLVES BY THE HOLDER OF A SINGLE WOLF HUNTING OR
WOLF TRAPPING LICENSE;
(IV) DURING THE WOLF TRAPPING SEASON, THE USE OF BAIT WHILE HUNTING OR TRAPPING WOLVES AS
LONG AS NO TRAP OR SNARE TRAP IS SET WITHIN 30 FEET OF EXPOSED BAIT VISIBLE FROM ABOVE; AND
(V) THE HUNTING OF WOLVES ON PRIVATE LANDS OUTSIDE OF DAYLIGHT HOURS WITH THE USE OF
ARTIFICIAL LIGHT OR NIGHT VISION SCOPES.
(C) THE UNLIMITED STATEWIDE QUOTA PROVIDED FOR IN SUBSECTION (2)(A) DOES NOT APPLY TO THE
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 176

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0176.4
GEOGRAPHIC AREA ESTABLISHED AS WOLF MANAGEMENT UNITS 313 AND 316 IN THE 2024 VERSION OF THE WOLF AND
FURBEARER TRAPPING AND HUNTING REGULATIONS PUBLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT. UNITS 313 AND 316 MUST BE
MANAGED PURSUANT TO 87-1-304(7) AND (8).
(3) The commission shall adopt rules to allow a landowner or the landowner's agent to take a wolf
on the landowner's property at any time without the purchase of a Class E-1 or Class E-2 wolf license when the
wolf is a potential threat to human safety, livestock, or dogs. The rules must:
(a) be consistent with the Montana gray wolf conservation and management plan and the adaptive
management principles of the commission and the department for the Montana gray wolf population;
(b) require a landowner or the landowner's agent who takes a wolf pursuant to this subsection (3)
to promptly report the taking to the department and to preserve the carcass of the wolf;
(c) establish a quota each year for the total number of wolves that may be taken pursuant to this
subsection (3); and
(d) allow the commission to issue a moratorium on the taking of wolves pursuant to this subsection
(3) before a quota is reached if the commission determines that circumstances require a limitation of the total
number of wolves taken.
(4) Public land permittees who have experienced livestock depredation must obtain a special kill
permit authorized in 87-5-131(3)(b) to take a wolf on public land without the purchase of a Class E-1 or Class
E-2 license.
(5) When determining wolf populations using integrated patch occupancy model estimates, the
department shall use the same modeling criteria for estimates made for subsequent years to ensure the data
results are able to be interpreted consistently. THE DEPARTMENT MAY USE NEW MODELING TECHNIQUES IN
CONJUNCTION WITH THE INTEGRATED PATCH OCCUPANCY MODEL TO ESTIMATE THE WOLF POPULATION MORE
ACCURATELY.
(5)(6) The department shall report annually to the environmental quality council in accordance with 5-
11-210 regarding the implementation of 87-5-131, 87-5-132, and this section."
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 176